Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General
§ 26-15-124.
Claim to be accepted or rejected; attorney's fee.

Claims for benefits under a life, accident or health insurance policy shall be rejected or accepted and paid by the insurer or its agent designated to receive the claims within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the proofs of loss and supporting evidence. Exceptions to the time of forty-five (45) days shall be made for accident and health insurance claims if there is any question as to the validity or the amount of the claim and the question is referred to the Wyoming state medical peer review committee for adjudication. Exceptions shall also be made as authorized by W.S. 26-16-112(a).

Claims for benefits under a property or casualty insurance policy shall be rejected or accepted and paid by the insurer or its agent designated to receive those claims within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the claim and supporting bills.

In any actions or proceedings commenced against any insurance company on any insurance policy or certificate of any type or kind of insurance, or in any case where an insurer is obligated by a liability insurance policy to defend any suit or claim or pay any judgment on behalf of a named insured, if it is determined that the company refuses to pay the full amount of a loss covered by the policy and that the refusal is unreasonable or without cause, any court in which judgment is rendered for a claimant may also award a reasonable sum as an attorney’s fee and interest at ten percent (10%) per year.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 198, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-328.1; Laws 1975, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-126

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2020 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added the last sentence.

Purpose of this section

is to protect an insured who has suffered a loss from annoying and expensive litigation. State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Intent of section is to assist beneficiaries by expediting resolution of claims and providing redress for insurers' wrongful refusals to pay. Smith v. Equitable Life Assurance Soc., 614 F.2d 720, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 20866 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1980).

Policy behind this section

is not to penalize insurance companies but to encourage claim statements and to chill any tendencies upon the part of insurance companies to unreasonably reject claims. State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Court action not required. —

By the terms of this section, a court action is not required as a condition precedent to the award of attorney's fees. Rather, a determination regarding reasonableness can come from any prior action or proceeding. Stewart Title Guar. Co. v. Tilden, 2005 WY 53, 110 P.3d 865,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2005).

Section covers surety contracts. —

Since surety contracts are treated as a type of insurance, they are included under subsection (c). State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Inapplicable to third party claimants. —

Where the third party claimants in an intra-family suit settled all their liability claims against an insured spouse and the insurer thereafter timely paid the amount of loss covered by its policy, the claimants remained outside the terms of this subsection, consistent with the exclusion under §

26-13-124

of noninsureds and nonnamed beneficiaries. Herrig v. Herrig, 844 P.2d 487,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1992).

Procedure under subsection (b). —

Subsection (b) applies to all claims made for benefits; it is not necessary that a claim under the subsection be made by the insured. Marathon Ashland Pipe Line LLC v. Maryland Cas. Co., 243 F.3d 1232, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 3990 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2001).

Execution of “claims made” policy. —

Under the unambiguous language of a professional liability “claims made” policy, the insurer had no coverage obligation for a claim made by a doctor as a result of a negligence action against him, since the first point at which a “claim”, as defined by the policy, was asserted against the doctor was December 1, 1989, while coverage under the policy expired on December 1, 1989. Doctors' Co. v. Insurance Corp. of Am., 864 P.2d 1018,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1993).

Effect of insurer's failure to timely decide claim. —

Life insurance company's failure to decide claim within 45 days of receipt constitutes a refusal to pay. Smith v. Equitable Life Assurance Soc., 614 F.2d 720, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 20866 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1980).

Insurance company did not breach its duties. —

This section allows for recovery of attorney's fees where an insurance company's refusal to pay the full amount of a claim is unreasonable or without cause, but where insurance company did not breach its duties under the performance bond, the claim for attorney fees under this section failed. St. Paul Fire & Marine Ins. Co. v. City of Green River, 93 F. Supp. 2d 1170, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6022 (D. Wyo. 2000), aff'd, 6 Fed. Appx. 828, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 6269 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2001).

No bad faith found in insurer's payment of benefits. —

The insurer's payment of medical benefits to the insured 10 weeks after the insured's accident was reported did not constitute bad faith, given that the insurer paid the benefits 24 days after receipt of the proof of loss form and associated medical bills and had never in fact denied medical payments during the 10 weeks. Darlow v. Farmers Ins. Exch., 822 P.2d 820,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1991).

Applicability. —

Defendant was not entitled to an award of prejudgment interest or attorneys’ fees under this section because the policies were issued in Texas, so the Wyoming insurance code was inapplicable. Lexington Ins. Co. v. Precision Drilling Co., L.P., 951 F.3d 1185, 2020 U.S. App. LEXIS 5810 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2020).

Insurance company did not breach its duties. —

Insurer’s refusal to reimburse an additional insured for a settlement was not unreasonable or without cause because the insurer, although ultimately unsuccessful on appeal, argued that reimbursing the settlement payment would amount to an indemnity action, which Wyoming’s anti-indemnity statute would bar, and the district court found the argument plausible and in fact ruled in its favor on the issue. Lexington Ins. Co. v. Precision Drilling Co., L.P., 951 F.3d 1185, 2020 U.S. App. LEXIS 5810 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2020).

No breach of duties. —

In breach of contract action over denial of an insurance claim, where the district court correctly found that all of plaintiff's claims for medical treatment were initially refused within the statutory 45-day period, although review of the claims continued for nearly a year thereafter, it was clear that the insurance company did not violate the requirements of the statute and the insurance company's refusal to pay was not unreasonable or without cause. Ahrenholtz v. Time Ins. Co., 968 P.2d 946,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1998).

Unnecessary to define “unreasonable or without just cause” for jury. —

The only question that the jury was asked to resolve was whether, in the language of subsection (c), the insurance company's refusal to pay was “unreasonable or without cause.” Further defining or explaining for the jury the meaning of “unreasonable or without cause” was unnecessary. Arnold v. Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co., 707 P.2d 161,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 576

(Wyo. 1985).

Attorney's fees not allowed. —

See Bruegger v. National Old Line Ins. Co., 387 F. Supp. 1177, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14077 (D. Wyo. 1975).

Where no evidence suggested that an insurance company's actions in refusing to provide coverage was unreasonable or without cause, the insurance company was entitled to summary judgment on the attorney's fee claim. Hutchinson Oil Co. v. Federated Serv. Ins. Co., 851 F. Supp. 1546, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6644 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Insured was not entitled to attorney's fees and costs under this section, where all of insured's claims were initially refused within statutory 45-day period, and insurer's refusal to pay was not unreasonable or without cause. Ahrenholtz v. Time Ins. Co., 968 P.2d 946,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1998).

Where payment of the life insurance policy proceeds to the decedent's business associates, as opposed to the widow, was proper, no basis existed for awarding fees, costs, and interest to the widow. Principal Life Ins. Co. v. Summit Well Serv., 2002 WY 172, 57 P.3d 1257,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. Jan. 7, 2003).

Non-insured claimants were properly denied attorney's fees because the insurer's denial of coverage was reasonable and fairly debatable, and the insurer's conduct did not rise to the level of bad faith. Cornhusker Cas. Co. v. Skaj, 786 F.3d 842, 2015 U.S. App. LEXIS 8175 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2015).

Attorney's fees recoverable. —

Attorney's fees and interest may be recoverable under this section when an insurer unreasonably or without cause refuses to pay a justifiable claim for uninsured motorist benefits. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Shrader, 882 P.2d 813,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1994).

Partial summary judgment was properly granted in favor of an insured in an action seeking to recover attorney's fees from a title insurer that failed to cure a defect within a reasonable amount of time because there was a private right of action, a court action was not a condition precedent to an award, and the refusal to pay included a refusal to fulfill contractual obligations. Stewart Title Guar. Co. v. Tilden, 2005 WY 53, 110 P.3d 865,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2005).

Applied

in

Tadday v. National Aviation Underwriters, 660 P.2d 1148,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1983); Hoiness-LaBar Ins. v. Julien Constr. Co., 743 P.2d 1262,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 520

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

McCullough v. Golden Rule Ins. Co., 789 P.2d 855,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1990); Davis v. State, 910 P.2d 555,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Establishing the Tort of Bad Faith in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 625 (1985).

For article, “Understanding the New Tort of First Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: McCullough v. Golden Rule Insurance Company,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1991).

For article, “Understanding the Tort of Third-Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: Western Casualty & Surety Company v. Fowler Revisited,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 635 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes bad faith on part of insurer rendering it liable for statutory penalty imposed for bad faith in failure to pay, or delay in paying, insured's claim, 33 ALR4th 579.

Value of insured's assets as limitation, in action by insured or insured's assignee for liability insurer's wrongful failure to defend, on recovery of amount of judgment against insured in excess of policy amount, 36 ALR4th 922.

Reinsurer's liability for primary liability insurer's failure to compromise or settle, 42 ALR4th 1130.

Credit life insurer's punitive damage liability for refusing payment, 55 ALR4th 246.

Emotional or mental distress as element of damages for liability insurer's wrongful refusal to settle, 57 ALR4th 801.

Policy provision limiting time within which action may be brought on the policy as applicable to tort action by insured against insurer, 66 ALR4th 859.

Liability of insurer to insured for settling third-party claim within policy limits resulting in detriment to insured, 18 ALR5th 474.

Liability of insurer for prejudgment interest in excess of policy limits for covered loss, 23 ALR5th 75.

Preemption by Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 USC § 901 et seq.) of state law claims for bad-faith dealing by insurer or agent of insurer, 90 ALR Fed 723.

§ 26-15-125.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 1, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, chapter 136, § 329, related to when a minor may give acquittance and discharge and the effect of appointment of a guardian.

§ 26-15-126.
Forms for proof of loss to be furnished.

An insurer, upon written request of any person claiming to have a loss under an insurance contract issued by that insurer, shall furnish forms of proof of loss for completion by the person. The insurer, because of the requirement to furnish forms, does not have any responsibility for or with reference to the completion of the proof or the manner of any completion or attempted completion.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 330; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-330; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-128

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Purpose of a proof of loss

is to enable an insurance company to investigate a loss so that it can determine its rights and liabilities and prevent fraud and unjust claims from being asserted. Hawkeye-Security Ins. Co. v. Apodaca, 524 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1974).

Insured's failure to file proof of loss forms within time requirement

stated in policy did not bar recovery from loss where the trial court held that because of the insurance company's own failures and shortcomings it could not be heard to complain of technical shortcomings of the insured where the company failed to show any prejudice or hindrance of its ability to investigate the loss due to the late filing of the formal proof of loss. Hawkeye-Security Ins. Co. v. Apodaca, 524 P.2d 874,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 26-15-127.
Uniform health insurance claim forms.

The commissioner shall prescribe uniform health insurance claim forms and formats for governmental agencies and health care providers as defined by W.S. 26-40-102(a)(i), which, after January 1, 1997, shall be used by all insurers transacting health insurance in this state and by all governmental agencies and health care providers of this state that require health insurance claim forms or formats for their records.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 29, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-330.1; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-129

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1995, ch. 93, § 2.

§ 26-15-128.
Insurer's acts not constituting waiver of policy provisions or defenses.

None of the following acts by or on behalf of an insurer constitutes a waiver of any provision of a policy, or of any right, or of any defense of the insurer thereunder or otherwise:

Acknowledgment of the receipt of notice of loss or claim under the policy;

Furnishing forms for reporting a loss or claim, for giving information relative thereto, or for making proof of loss, or receiving or acknowledging receipt of the forms or proofs completed or uncompleted;

Investigating any loss or claim under any policy or engaging in negotiations looking toward a possible settlement of any such loss or claim.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 331; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-331; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-130

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurer's waiver of, or estoppel to assert, lack of insurable interest in property insured under fire policy, 91 ALR3d 513.

§ 26-15-129.
Exemption of proceeds; life insurance.

If a policy of insurance is executed by any person on his own life or on another life, in favor of a person other than himself, or except in cases of transfer with intent to defraud creditors, if a policy of life insurance is assigned or in any way made payable to that person, the lawful beneficiary or assignee thereof, other than the insured or the person executing insurance or executors or administrators of the insured or the person executing the insurance, are entitled to its proceeds, including death benefits, cash surrender and loan values, premiums waived and dividends, whether used in reduction of premiums or otherwise, excepting only where the debtor, subsequent to issuance of the policy, has actually elected to receive the dividends in cash, against the creditors and representatives of the insured and of the person executing the policy, and are not liable to be applied by any legal or equitable process to pay any debt or liability of the insured individual or his beneficiary or of any other person having a right under the policy, whether or not:

The right to change the beneficiary is reserved or permitted; and

The policy is made payable to the person whose life is insured if the beneficiary or assignee predeceases that person, and the proceeds are exempt from all liability for any debt of the beneficiary existing at the time the policy is made available for his use.

However, subject to the statute of limitations, the amount of any premiums paid for insurance with intent to defraud creditors, with interest thereon, shall inure to their benefit from the policy proceeds; but the insurer issuing the policy is discharged of all liability thereon by payment of its proceeds in accordance with its terms, unless before payment the insurer receives written notice at its home office, by or in behalf of a creditor of:

A claim to recover for transfer made or premiums paid with intent to defraud creditors;

The amount claimed along with facts as will assist the insurer to ascertain the particular policy.

For the purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a policy is payable to a person other than the insured if and to the extent that a facility-of-payment clause or similar clause in the policy permits the insurer to discharge its obligation after the death of the individual insured by paying the death benefits to a person as permitted by the clause.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 332; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-332; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-131

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 113, § 1.

Bankruptcy. —

Where bankruptcy debtors were the owners of four life insurance policies and their daughter, a non-debtor, was the beneficiary, the cash surrender value of the policies was not exempt under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 26-15-129(a); any interest of the beneficiary that may exist is not relevant in determining the rights of insured debtor. Evans v. Royal (In re Evans), 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21893 (D. Wyo. Jan. 11, 2000).

Applied

in

Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 106 F.2d 561,

1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 4715

(10th Cir. 1939); Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Stated

in

Michaels v. Zubrod, 282 B.R. 234, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 896 (10th Cir. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exemption of insurance proceeds as available to assignee, 1 ALR2d 1031.

§ 26-15-130.
Exemption of proceeds; disability insurance.

Except as otherwise provided by the policy or contract, the proceeds of all contracts of disability insurance and of provisions specifying benefits because of the insured’s disability, which are supplemental to any life insurance or annuity contracts executed, are exempt from all liability for any debt of the insured and from any debt of the beneficiary existing at the time the proceeds are made available for his use.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 333; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-333; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-132

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-131.
Exemption of proceeds; group insurance.

A policy of group life insurance or group disability insurance or the proceeds thereof, including death benefits, cash surrender and loan values, premiums waived and dividends, whether used in reduction of premiums or otherwise, excepting only where the debtor, subsequent to issuance of the policy, has actually elected to receive the dividends in cash, payable to the individual insured or to the named beneficiary are not liable to be applied by any legal or equitable process to pay any debt or liability of the insured individual or his beneficiary or of any other person having a right under the policy. The proceeds, when not made payable to a named beneficiary, or to a third person pursuant to a facility-of-payment clause, do not constitute a part of the insured individual’s estate for the payment of his debts.

This section does not apply to group insurance issued pursuant to this code [title 26] to a creditor covering his debtors, to the extent that the proceeds are applied to payment of the obligation for the purpose of which the insurance is issued.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 334; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-334; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-133

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 113, § 1.

Cited

in

Evans v. Royal (In re Evans), — F. Supp. 2d —, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21893 (D. Wyo. Jan. 11, 2000).

§ 26-15-132.
Exemption of proceeds; annuity contracts; assignability of rights.

The benefits, rights, privileges and options which under any annuity contract issued are due or prospectively due the annuitant, are not subject to execution nor is the annuitant compelled to exercise any such rights, powers or options. Creditors are not allowed to interfere with or terminate the contract, except:

As to amounts paid for or as premium on the annuity with intent to defraud creditors, with interest thereon, and of which the creditor gives the insurer written notice at its home office prior to the making of the payment to the annuitant out of which the creditor seeks to recover, which notice shall specify:

The amount claimed or facts to enable the ascertainment of the amount; and

Facts to enable the insurer to ascertain the annuity contract, the annuitant and the payment sought to be avoided on the ground of fraud.

The total exemption of benefits presently due and payable to any annuitant periodically or at stated times under all annuity contracts under which he is an annuitant shall not at any time exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) per month for the length of time represented by the installments, and any periodic payments in excess of three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) per month are subject to garnishee execution to the same extent as are wages and salaries;

If the total benefits presently due and payable to any annuitant under any annuity contracts at any time exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) per month, the court may order the annuitant to pay to a judgment creditor or apply on the judgment, in installments, that portion of the excess benefits as to the court appear just and proper, after regard for the reasonable requirements of the judgment debtor and his family, if dependent upon him, as well as any payments required to be made by the annuitant to other creditors under prior court order.

If the contract provides, the benefits, rights, privileges or options accruing under that contract to a beneficiary or assignee are not transferable nor subject to commutation, and if the benefits are payable periodically or at stated times, the same exemptions and exceptions contained in this section for the annuitant, apply to the beneficiary or assignee.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 335; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-335; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-134

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Exempt annuity contract. —

Under this statute, annuity contract was entirely exempt because no payments were “presently due and payable” on the petition date. Royal v. Pancratz (In re Pancratz), 175 B.R. 85, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17086 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Post-petition annuity payments due and payable to Chapter 7 debtors, except for the payment due on the first regular date following the petition, were exempt; therefore, estate had no right to future payments which were not due and payable on the petition date. Royal v. Pancratz (In re Pancratz), 175 B.R. 85, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17086 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Fraud. —

Annuity contracts funded by the debtors' reduction of all of their available unencumbered assets to cash were not exempt under the statute, notwithstanding the debtors' argument that there was no intent to defraud their creditors because they did not conceal the transactions and they acted on the advice of counsel, where the debtors deliberately funded the annuity contracts and then filed a bankruptcy case in order to prevent their creditors from obtaining unencumbered assets to satisfy claims. Royal v. Baker (In re Baker), 273 B.R. 892, 2002 Bankr. LEXIS 130 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 2002).

§ 26-15-133.
Retention of proceeds of policy by company.

Any life insurer may hold the proceeds of any life or endowment insurance or annuity contract it issues:

Upon the terms and restrictions as to revocation by the insured and control by beneficiaries;

With the exemptions from legal process and the claims of creditors of beneficiaries, other than the insured; and

Upon any other terms and conditions, regardless of the time and manner of payment of proceeds, agreed to in writing by the insurer and the insured or beneficiary.

The insurer is not required to segregate funds held under subsection (a) of this section but may hold them as a part of its general corporate assets.

The provisions of this section do not impair or affect any rights of creditors under W.S.

26-15-129

or

26-15-132

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 336; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-336; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-135

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-134.
Venue of suits against insurers.

Suit upon causes of action arising within this state against an insurer over an insurance contract shall be brought in the county where the cause of action arose or in the county where the policyholder instituting the action resides.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 337; W.S. 1957 § 26.1-337; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-136

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

This section was not applicable

to a suit by a widow who was a resident of New Mexico for the recovery of proceeds under a life insurance policy issued by an insurer which had its principal place of business in North Carolina, on the life of her husband who had been a resident of South Dakota and who allegedly died in North Dakota. Lohman v. Jefferson Std. Life Ins. Co., 525 P.2d 1,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 26-15-135.
Coverage of children.

No insurance company, multi-employer trust or other provider of an individual, group or blanket health insurance product in this state shall:

Refuse to accept and honor an otherwise valid claim for a covered service which is filed by either parent of a covered child, or by the department of family services in the case of an assignment under W.S.

20-6-106

, who submits valid copies of medical bills;

Refuse to provide medical insurance coverage of a child under the health plan of the child’s parent on the grounds that:

The child was born out of wedlock;

The child is not claimed as a dependent on the parent’s federal tax return; or

The child does not reside with the parent or in the insurer’s service area.

Refuse to provide medical insurance coverage for an otherwise insurable child under the policy if the child for whom the claim is made is presumed to be the natural child of the insured under W.S.

14-2-504

or

14-2-822

.

Where a child has health coverage through an insurer of a noncustodial parent or a parent sharing custody or temporary control of the child the insurer shall:

Provide such information to either parent sharing custody or temporary control of the child as may be necessary for the child to obtain benefits through that coverage;

Permit either parent sharing custody or temporary control of the child, or the provider with either parent’s approval, to submit claims for covered services without the approval of the other parent; and

Make payments on claims submitted in accordance with paragraph (ii) of this subsection directly to the parent who paid for the services, the provider or the department of health as administrator of the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act.

Where a parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health coverage for a child and the parent is eligible for family health coverage, the insurer shall be required:

To permit the parent to enroll under the family coverage, a child who is otherwise eligible for the coverage without regard to any enrollment season restrictions;

If the parent is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, to enroll the child under family coverage upon application of the child’s other parent, the department of health in administering the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act, or the department of family services in administering the child support enforcement program;

To complete and return the plan administrator response in conjunction with the national medical support notice to the department of family services within forty (40) business days after the date of the notice; and

Not to disenroll or eliminate coverage of the child unless the insurer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

The court or administrative order is no longer in effect; or

The child is or will be enrolled in comparable health coverage through another insurer which will take effect not later than the effective date of disenrollment.

An insurer may not impose requirements on a state agency, which has been assigned the rights of an individual eligible for medical assistance under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act and covered for health benefits from the insurer, that are different from requirements applicable to an agent or assignee of any other individual so covered.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 15, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 198, § 1; 1995, ch. 18, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 2; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2004, ch. 17, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to an uninsured child health insurance program for low income families, see §

35-25-101

et seq.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c)(iii), substituted “the date” for “receipt.”

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See §

42-4-101

et. seq.

§ 26-15-136.
Assignment of insurance proceeds to doctor, hospital or state agency; lien for state care; notice of lien.

Whenever a contract by a third party agency provides for payment to a beneficiary under the contract for expenses incurred by him for medical, surgical or hospital care, the beneficiary shall assign the benefits of the contract to the Wyoming department of health or any doctor or hospital, or other practitioner rendering the care in an amount equal to the value of the care rendered. Notification sent by registered or certified mail to the third party agency, with a copy to the insured, shall provide authority for the payment directly by the third party agency to the assignee. The state shall have a lien, in an amount equal to the care rendered, on the proceeds of the contracts for care rendered by any hospital, institution or other facility, written notice of which shall provide authority for payment directly by the third party agency to the state.

Whenever there is in existence a contract between an insurer and an insured for payment to, or on behalf of, an applicant or recipient of medical assistance under the contract for expenses incurred by the applicant or recipient for medical services, including physician services, nursing services, pharmaceutical services, surgical care and hospital care, the assignment of the benefits of the contract by the applicant or recipient or a legally liable party shall, upon receipt of notice from the assignee, provide authority for payment by the insurer directly to the assignee. If notice is provided by the assignee to the insurer in accordance with the provisions of W.S

42-4-204

, the insurer shall be liable to the assignee for any amount payable to the assignee under the contract.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1.